District of Columbia statutes.
1-309.33

Qualifications of members.

Members of the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions which are established pursuant to the provisions of this part shall:

(1)

Be nominated in the manner prescribed in § 1-309.05(b); and

(2)

Have those qualifications specified in § 1-309.05(a).

June 19, 1976, D.C. Law 1-72, § 4, 23 DCR 576
1973 Ed., § 1-171o.
1981 Ed., § 1-267.